Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.270

Local officers, beginning of terms—Organization of district boards of directors.

The term of every city, town, and district officer elected to office on the first Tuesday following the first Monday in November of the odd-numbered years begins in accordance with *RCW 29A.20.040. However, a person elected to less than a full term shall assume office as soon as the election returns have been certified and he or she is qualified in accordance with RCW 29A.04.133.

Each board of directors of every district shall be organized at the first meeting held after one or more newly elected directors take office.

[ 2003 c 111 s 503; 1979 ex.s. c 126 s 14; 1965 c 123 s 6; 1965 c 9 s 29.13.050. Prior: 1963 c 200 s 8; 1959 c 86 s 1; prior: 1951 c 257 s 6. (i) 1949 c 161 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 5146-1. (ii) 1949 c 163 s 1; 1921 c 61 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 5146. Formerly RCW 29A.20.030, 29.13.050.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 29A.20.040 was recodified as RCW 29A.60.280 pursuant to 2013 c 11 s 93.

Purpose—1979 ex.s. c 126: See RCW 29A.60.280(1).